udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N3 Y 350 # для одушевленных
SFX N3 0 э [дзлнстуеӧыю]  #ед.ч.
SFX N3 0 е [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 ь е ь
SFX N3 й е й
SFX N3 0 эд [дзлнстуеӧыю] 
SFX N3 0 ед [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 ь ед ь
SFX N3 й ед й 
SFX N3 0 эз [дзлнстуеӧыю]  
SFX N3 0 ез [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 ь ез ь
SFX N3 й ез й
SFX N3 0 мы .
SFX N3 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 ме . #1лицо	 вин.п.
SFX N3 0 мес . 
SFX N3 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]  #2л.
SFX N3 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N3 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь 
SFX N3 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX N3 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 лэн . 		#род.п.
SFX N3 0 элэн [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эдлэн [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эзлэн [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 елэн [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 едлэн [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 езлэн [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 ь елэн ь
SFX N3 й елэн й
SFX N3 ь едлэн ь
SFX N3 й едлэн й
SFX N3 ь езлэн ь
SFX N3 й езлэн й
SFX N3 0 мылэн .
SFX N3 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 лэсь . 	# разд.п.
SFX N3 0 лэсьсэ .
SFX N3 0 элэсь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эдлэсь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эзлэсь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 елэсь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 едлэсь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 езлэсь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 ь елэсь ь
SFX N3 й елэсь й
SFX N3 ь едлэсь ь
SFX N3 й едлэсь й
SFX N3 ь езлэсь ь
SFX N3 й езлэсь й
SFX N3 0 мылэсь .
SFX N3 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 лы .		 # дат.п.
SFX N3 0 элы [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эдлы [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эзлы [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 елы [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 едлы [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 езлы [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 ь елы ь
SFX N3 й елы й
SFX N3 ь едлы ь
SFX N3 й едлы й
SFX N3 ь езлы ь
SFX N3 й езлы й
SFX N3 0 мылы .
SFX N3 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 тэк . #лиш.п.
SFX N3 0 этэк [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эдтэк [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эзтэк [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 етэк [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 едтэк [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 езтэк [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 ь етэк ь
SFX N3 й етэк й
SFX N3 ь едтэк ь
SFX N3 й едтэк й
SFX N3 ь езтэк ь
SFX N3 й езтэк й
SFX N3 0 мытэк .
SFX N3 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 ъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь] #соотв.п.
SFX N3 0 я [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь]
SFX N3 0 эя [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эдъя [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 эзъя [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N3 0 ея [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 едъя [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 0 езъя [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N3 ь ея ь
SFX N3 й ея й
SFX N3 ь едъя ь
SFX N3 й едъя й
SFX N3 ь езъя ь
SFX N3 й езъя й
SFX N3 0 мыя .
SFX N3 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N3 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N3 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N3 0 эн [дзлнстуеӧыюу] #твор.п.
SFX N3 0 ен [^дзлнстуеӧыюуь]
SFX N3 ь ен ь
SFX N3 й ен й
SFX N3 0 эным [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N3 0 эныд [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N3 0 эныз [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N3 0 еным [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N3 0 еныд [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N3 0 еныз [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N3 й еным й
SFX N3 й еныд й
SFX N3 й еныз й
SFX N3 ь еным ь
SFX N3 ь еныд ь
SFX N3 ь еныз ь
SFX N3 0 энымы [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N3 0 эныды [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N3 0 энызы [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N3 0 енымы [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N3 0 еныды [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N3 0 енызы [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N3 й енымы й
SFX N3 й еныды й
SFX N3 й енызы й
SFX N3 ь енымы ь
SFX N3 ь еныды ь
SFX N3 ь енызы ь
SFX N3 0 ъёс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # МН.ч. им.п.
SFX N3 0 ос [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёс [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёссы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 оссы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыд [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсмы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёссы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # вин.п.
SFX N3 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсмес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёстэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёссэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёссэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осмес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 остэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 остэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 оссэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 оссэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсме [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсмес [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёстэ [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёстэс [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёссэ [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёссэс [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёслэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # род.п.
SFX N3 0 ослэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёслэн [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыдлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсызлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсмылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёстылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёссылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыдлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осызлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осмылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 остылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 оссылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсылэн [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыдлэн [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсызлэн [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсмылэн [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёстылэн [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёссылэн [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёслэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # разд.п.
SFX N3 0 ослэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёслэсь [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыдлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсызлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсмылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёстылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёссылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыдлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осызлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осмылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 остылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 оссылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыдлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсызлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсмылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёстылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёссылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёслы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # дат.п.
SFX N3 0 ослы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёслы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыдлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсызлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсмылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёстылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёссылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 осылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осыдлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осызлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 осмылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 остылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 оссылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёсылы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсыдлы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсызлы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёсмылы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёстылы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ёссылы [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёстэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # лиш.п.
SFX N3 0 остэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N3 0 ёстэк [ьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсыдтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсызтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N3 0 ъёсмытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
